California, session 20252026, SB965.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 18732 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 18731, to read:18732. Beginning January 1, 2028, a public library shall not require the presence of a parent or guardian for the issuance of a library card to a California resident who is 16 or 17 years of age, however, a public library may require a parent’s or guardian’s consent or signature for the issuance of a library card to a California resident who is 16 or 17 years of age. age unless the minor is emancipated.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.